District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

5-1131

Established; purpose; authority to act.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-158, § 2, 27 DCR 5127
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 803(a), 42 DCR 3684

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 4-901.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of chapter upon the effective date of the Omnibus Budget Support Act of 1995, see § 503(a) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-44, April 28, 1995, 42 DCR 2217) and § 803(a) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Effective Dates

Section 803(a) of D.C. Law 11-52 repealed §§ 5-1131 to 5-1140 on the effective Dates of the Omnibus Budget Support Act of 1995. The Omnibus Budget Support Act of 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, was effective September 26, 1995.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority—Secretary of the District of Columbia, see Mayor’s Order 95-26, January 27, 1995.

Editor's Notes

Transfer of pending cases: For temporary transfer of all cases pending with the Civilian Complaint Review Board to the Internal Affairs Division of the Metropolitan Police Department, see § 503(b) of the Omnibus Budget Support Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-44, April 28, 1995, 42 DCR 2217) and § 803(b) of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).

Section 803(b) of D.C. Law 11-52 provided that all cases pending with the Civilian Complaint Review Board on the effective date of the Omnibus Budget Support Act of 1995 shall be transferred to, and adjudicated according to the procedures of, the Internal Affairs Division of the Metropolitan Police Department.